Utah statutes.
32A-13-102 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Arrests.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all arrests of persons for any
violation of this title shall be made in accordance with Title 77, Chapter 7,
Utah Code of Criminal Procedure, and Rules 6 and 7, Utah Rules of Criminal
Procedure. All summons in lieu of warrants of arrest shall be in accordance
with Rule 6, Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure.
